California, session 20252026, AB1965.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 26070 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:26070. Retailers, Distributors, Microbusinesses, and Combined Activities.(a) State licenses to be issued by the department related to the sale and distribution of cannabis and cannabis products are as follows:(1) A retailer shall have a licensed premises which is a physical location from which commercial cannabis activities are conducted. A retailer’s premises may be closed to the public. A retailer may conduct sales exclusively by delivery.(2) A distributor licensee shall be bonded and insured at a minimum level established by the department.(3) (A) Microbusiness or combined activities licenses that authorize cultivation of cannabis shall include the license conditions described in subdivision (b) of Section 26060.1.(B)  The department shall establish a process by which an applicant for a microbusiness or combined activities license can demonstrate compliance with all the requirements under this division for the activities that will be conducted under the license.(b) The department shall establish minimum security and transportation safety requirements for the commercial distribution and delivery of cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products. Except as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 26110, the transportation of cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products shall only be conducted by licensed persons authorized to engage in distribution under this division or employees of those persons. Transportation safety standards established by the department shall include, but not be limited to, minimum standards governing the types of vehicles in which cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products may be distributed and delivered and minimum qualifications for persons eligible to operate such vehicles.(c) The driver of a vehicle transporting or transferring cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products shall be directly employed by a licensee authorized to transport or transfer cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products.(d) Notwithstanding any other law, all vehicles transporting cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products for hire shall be required to have a valid motor carrier permit pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 34620) of Division 14.85 of the Vehicle Code. The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall have authority over the safe operation of these vehicles, including, but not limited to, requiring licensees engaged in the transportation of cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products to participate in the Basic Inspection of Terminals (BIT) program pursuant to Section 34501.12 of the Vehicle Code.(e) Prior to transporting cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products, a licensed distributor shall do both of the following:(1) Complete an electronic shipping manifest as prescribed by the department. The shipping manifest shall include the unique identifier, pursuant to Section 26067, issued by the department for the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product.(2) Securely transmit the manifest to the department and the licensee that will receive the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product.(f) During transportation, the licensed distributor shall maintain a physical copy of the shipping manifest and make it available upon request to agents of the department and law enforcement officers.(g) The licensee receiving the shipment shall maintain each electronic shipping manifest and shall make it available upon request to the department and any law enforcement officers.(h) Upon receipt of the transported shipment, the licensee receiving the shipment shall submit to the department a record verifying receipt of the shipment and the details of the shipment.(i) Transporting, or arranging for or facilitating the transport of, cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products in violation of this chapter is grounds for disciplinary action against the license.(j) Licensed retailers, microbusinesses, and combined activities, and licensed nonprofits under Section 26070.5, shall implement security measures reasonably designed to prevent unauthorized entrance into areas containing cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products and theft of cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products from the premises. These security measures shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) Prohibiting individuals from remaining on the licensee’s premises if they are not engaging in activity expressly related to the operations of the retailer.(2) Establishing limited access areas accessible only to authorized personnel.(3) Other than limited amounts of cannabis or cannabis products used for display purposes, samples, or immediate sale, storing all finished cannabis and cannabis products in a secured and locked room, safe, or vault, and in a manner reasonably designed to prevent diversion, theft, and loss.(k) A retailer shall notify the department and the appropriate law enforcement authorities within 24 hours after discovering any of the following:(1) Significant discrepancies identified during inventory. The level of significance shall be determined by the department.(2) Diversion, theft, loss, or any criminal activity pertaining to the operation of the retailer.(3) Diversion, theft, loss, or any criminal activity by any agent or employee of the retailer pertaining to the operation of the retailer.(4) The loss or unauthorized alteration of records related to cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products, registered qualifying patients, primary caregivers, or retailer employees or agents.(5) Any other breach of security.(l) A retailer and any other licensee authorized to engage in the retail sale of cannabis or cannabis products shall provide the certificate of analysis associated with any cannabis or cannabis product held or offered for retail sale to a customer upon request of the customer or the department.(m) A retailer and any other licensee authorized to engage in the retail sale of cannabis or cannabis products shall allow the department to obtain or access any cannabis or cannabis products held or offered for retail sale for the purposes of conducting off-the-shelf laboratory testing in compliance with this division or the department’s regulations. SEC. 2. Section 26100 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:26100. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products shall not be sold pursuant to a license provided for under this division unless a representative sample of the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products has been tested by a licensed testing laboratory.(b) Upon entry into the licensed market, industrial hemp shall be held in quarantine by the distributor and tested by a licensed testing laboratory to confirm it meets the definition of industrial hemp contained in Section 26001 before transfer to another licensee or incorporation into a cannabis product. Quarantined plant material that is determined not to be industrial hemp shall be destroyed.(c) The department shall develop criteria to determine which batches shall be tested. tested or retested. All testing of the samples shall be performed on the final form in which the cannabis or cannabis product will be consumed or used, unless otherwise specified in this division.(d) Testing of batches to meet the requirements of this division shall only be conducted by a licensed testing laboratory.(e) For each batch tested, the testing laboratory shall issue a certificate of analysis for selected lots at a frequency determined by the department with supporting data, to report both of the following:(1) Whether the chemical profile of the sample conforms to the labeled content of compounds, including, but not limited to, all of the following, unless limited through regulation by the department:(A) Tetrahydrocannabinol (THC).(B) Tetrahydrocannabinolic Acid (THCA).(C) Cannabidiol (CBD).(D) Cannabidiolic Acid (CBDA).(E) The terpenes required by the department in regulation.(F) Cannabigerol (CBG).(G) Cannabinol (CBN).(H) Other compounds or contaminants required by the department.(2) That the presence of contaminants does not exceed the levels established by the department. In establishing the levels, the department shall consider the American Herbal Pharmacopoeia monograph, guidelines set by the Department of Pesticide Regulation pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 26060, and any other relevant sources. For purposes of this paragraph, “contaminants” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) Residual solvent or processing chemicals.(B) Foreign material, including, but not limited to, hair, insects, or similar or related adulterant.(C) Microbiological impurities as identified by the department in regulation.(3) For edible cannabis products, that the milligrams per serving of THC does not exceed 10 milligrams per serving, plus or minus 12 percent. After January 1, 2022, the milligrams of THC per serving shall not deviate from 10 milligrams by more than 10 percent.(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), the department shall establish regulations to adjust testing variances for edible cannabis products that include less than five milligrams of THC in total.(f) A testing laboratory may amend a certificate of analysis to correct minor errors, as defined by the department.(g) (1) Standards for residual levels of volatile organic compounds shall be established by the department.(2) On or before January 1, 2023, the department shall establish a standard cannabinoids test method, including standardized operating procedures, that shall be utilized by all testing laboratories. The department may establish more than one method for use by testing laboratories and these standards may be developed through a reference laboratory.(h) The testing laboratory shall conduct all testing required by this section in a manner consistent with general requirements for the competence of testing and calibrations activities, including sampling and using verified methods.(i) All testing laboratories performing tests pursuant to this section shall obtain and maintain ISO/IEC 17025 accreditation as required by the department in regulation.(j) (1) The testing laboratory may be subject to performance testing by the department to ensure consistency of results across laboratories.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “performance testing” may include, but is not limited to, blind proficiency testing, round robin testing, and any other type of programs that may be used to demonstrate competent performance of a testing laboratory. (j)(k) (1) If a test result falls outside the specifications authorized by law or regulation, the testing laboratory shall follow a standard operating procedure to confirm or refute the original result.(2) If a test result falls outside the specifications authorized by law or regulation, the testing laboratory may retest the sample if both either of the following occur:(A) The testing laboratory notifies the department, in writing, that the test was compromised due to equipment malfunction, staff error, or other circumstances allowed by regulation, or if retesting is required by the department.(B) The department authorizes the testing laboratory to retest the sample.(k)(l) A testing laboratory shall destroy the remains of the sample of cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product upon completion of the analysis, as determined by the department through regulations.(l)(m) Presale inspection, testing transfer, or transportation of cannabis or cannabis products pursuant to this section shall conform to a specified chain of custody protocol and any other requirements imposed under this division.(m)(n) This division does not prohibit a licensee from performing testing on the licensee’s premises for the purposes of quality control of the product in conjunction with reasonable business operations. This division also does not prohibit a licensee from performing testing on the licensee’s premises of cannabis or cannabis products obtained from another licensee. Onsite testing by the licensee shall not be certified by the department and does not exempt the licensee from the requirements of compliance testing at a testing laboratory pursuant to this section.SEC. 3. Section 26104 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:26104. (a) A licensed testing laboratory shall, in performing activities concerning cannabis and cannabis products, comply with the requirements and restrictions set forth in applicable law and regulations.(b) The department shall develop procedures to do all of the following:(1) Ensure that testing of cannabis and cannabis products occurs prior to distribution to retailers, microbusinesses, or nonprofits licensed under Section 26070.5.(2) Specify how often licensees shall test cannabis and cannabis products, and that the cost of testing cannabis shall be borne by the licensed cultivators and the cost of testing cannabis products shall be borne by the licensed manufacturer, and that the costs of testing cannabis and cannabis products shall be borne by a nonprofit licensed under Section 26070.5.(3) Require destruction of harvested batches whose testing samples indicate noncompliance with health and safety standards required by the department, unless remedial measures can bring the cannabis or cannabis products into compliance with quality assurance standards as specified by law and implemented by the department.(4) Ensure that a testing laboratory employee takes the sample of cannabis or cannabis products from the distributor’s premises for testing required by this division and that the testing laboratory employee transports the sample to the testing laboratory. The driver transporting the sample pursuant to this requirement shall be directly employed by the testing laboratory.(c) (1) Except as provided in this division, a testing laboratory shall not acquire or receive cannabis or cannabis products except from a licensee in accordance with this division, and shall not distribute, sell, or dispense cannabis or cannabis products, from the licensed premises from which the cannabis or cannabis products were acquired or received. All transfer or transportation shall be performed pursuant to a specified chain of custody protocol.(2) A testing laboratory may receive and test samples of cannabis or cannabis products from a state or local law enforcement, or a prosecuting or regulatory agency in order to test the cannabis or cannabis products. For purposes of this section, testing conducted by a testing laboratory for state or local law enforcement, a prosecuting agency, or a regulatory agency is not commercial cannabis activity and shall not be arranged or overseen by the department. activity. A licensed testing laboratory shall comply with the department’s request to evaluate the laboratory’s testing practices, as determined in department regulations.(d) A testing laboratory may receive and test samples of cannabis or cannabis products from a licensed manufacturer or licensed cultivator for quality control purposes. A testing laboratory shall not certify samples from a licensed manufacturer or licensed cultivator for retail sale. All tests performed by a testing laboratory for a licensed manufacturer or licensed cultivator shall be recorded with the name of the licensee and the amount of cannabis or cannabis product received.(e) A testing laboratory may receive and test samples of cannabis or cannabis products from a qualified patient or primary caregiver with a valid physician’s recommendation for cannabis for medicinal purposes. A testing laboratory shall not certify samples from a qualified patient or primary caregiver for resale or transfer to another person or licensee. All tests performed by a testing laboratory for a qualified patient or primary caregiver shall be recorded with the name of the qualified patient or primary caregiver and the amount of cannabis or cannabis product received.(f) A testing laboratory may receive and test samples of cannabis or cannabis products from a person over 21 years of age when the cannabis has been grown by that person and will be used solely for that person’s use, as authorized pursuant to Section 11362.1 of the Health and Safety Code. A testing laboratory shall not certify samples from the person over 21 years of age for resale or transfer to another person or licensee. All tests recorded pursuant to this subdivision shall be recorded with the name of the person submitting the sample and the amount of cannabis or cannabis product received.